Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 64.2-1030.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.31; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1031.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.32; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1032.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 354, cl. 2.

History.

1999, c. 975, § 55-277.33; 2012, c. 614; repealed by 2022, c. 354.